Utah statutes.
53B-17-505.   City to provide services and facilities to research park -- Fees and charges -- Disallowance of special improvement district or special taxes.

(1)  The Salt Lake City Council shall provide police and fire protection and furnish, install, and maintain customary municipal services and facilities for street lighting, traffic control, sidewalks, curb, gutter, drainage, sewage disposal, and water supply to all areas of the research park established upon lands conveyed to the University of Utah under the patent.

(2)  The services and facilities are to be furnished and provided as needed and determined by the State Board of Regents subject to connection fees, use charges, and other service fees customarily assessed against similar persons, companies, or properties within the territorial limits of Salt Lake City.

(3)  No special improvement district may be created or special taxes imposed with respect to the services and facilities provided under this section.

